Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.153

Review of proposed incorporation in county with boundary review board.

The proposed incorporation of any city or town that includes territory located in a county in which a boundary review board exists shall be reviewed by the boundary review board and action taken as described under RCW 36.93.150.

[ 1994 c 216 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 216: See note following RCW 35.02.015.